src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Sublexica for verb roots

-----------------------------
Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
v1  kaste       kaster      kasta       kasta
kastet      kastet
v2  lyse        lyser       lyste       lyst
reparere    reparerer   reparerte   reparert
v3  leve        lever       levde       levd
v4  nå          når         nådde       nådd
v4  bie         bier        bidde       bidd

Subtypes
v12 v1 or v2
v13 v1 or v3
v14 v1 or v4
v1-s passive v1 verbs
v2-s passive v2 verbs
v3-s passive v3 verbs

## Sublexica for regular verbs 

### Preliminary lexica

**LEXICON vx** points to v1.

**LEXICON v12** for both v1 and v2 past forms, or: score -> scoret, scorte (NG  = do not generate)

**LEXICON v12et** for verbs with v2 and the -et forms of v1, like "skynde" (but not "tilskynde", "framskynde" etc.)

**LEXICON v13** also here: v1, v3: sveve -> svevet (NG), svevde.

**LEXICON v13et** for verbs with v3 and the -et forms of v1, like "tygge"

**LEXICON v23** 

**LEXICON v14** where v4 is NG

**LEXICON v1** =  kaste

**LEXICON v2** = blåse, studere

**LEXICON v3** =  leve

**LEXICON v4** =  ro, bie

**LEXICON v1-s** =  undres

**LEXICON v2-s** =  føles, synes

**LEXICON v3-s** =  trives

## Conjugation sublexica

**LEXICON inf-prsptc** = 

**LEXICON regpres** = 

**LEXICON r-pres** = 

**LEXICON a-et-pret** = 

**LEXICON et-pret** = 

**LEXICON te-pret** = 

**LEXICON de-pret** = 

**LEXICON dde-pret** = 

**LEXICON prsptcsuff** = 

### Sublexica for irregular verbs 

* **LEXICON BE** 
* **LEXICON BINDE** 
* **LEXICON XITE** 
* **LEXICON BLI** 
* **LEXICON BLIVE** 
* **LEXICON BRENNE** 
* **LEXICON BRESTE** 
* **LEXICON BRINGE** 
* **LEXICON BRISTE** 
* **LEXICON XYTE** = yte, flyte, tryte
* **LEXICON BURDE** 
* **LEXICON BY** 
* **LEXICON XYDE** = lyde, tyde, syde, ... 
* **LEXICON BÆRE** 
* **LEXICON XETTE** 
* **LEXICON DRA** 
* **LEXICON XIKKE** = drikke
* **LEXICON DRIVE** 
* **LEXICON DRITE** 
* **LEXICON DØLGE** 
* **LEXICON DØ** 
* **LEXICON EIE** 
* **LEXICON ETE** 
* **LEXICON FALLE** 
* **LEXICON FARE** 
* **LEXICON FINNE** 
* **LEXICON FINNES** 
* **LEXICON FISE** 
* **LEXICON FLY** 
* **LEXICON LYGE**
* **LEXICON LYVE**
* **LEXICON LJUGE**
* **LEXICON FLYGE**
* **LEXICON FLYTE**
* **LEXICON LATE**
* **LEXICON FRYSE**
* **LEXICON FYKE**
* **LEXICON FÅ**
* **LEXICON FØLGE**
* **LEXICON GALE**
* **LEXICON GIDDE**
* **LEXICON GI**
* **LEXICON GJELDE**
* **LEXICON GJØRE**
* **LEXICON GLEPPE**
* **LEXICON GLI**
* **LEXICON XIPPE** = glippe, slippe
* **LEXICON GNAGE**
* **LEXICON GNI**
* **LEXICON GRAVE**
* **LEXICON GRINE**
* **LEXICON GRIPE**
* **LEXICON GRÅTE**
* **LEXICON GYSE**
* **LEXICON GYTE**
* **LEXICON GYVE**
* **LEXICON GÅ**
* **LEXICON HA**
* **LEXICON HENGE**
* **LEXICON HETE**
* **LEXICON HIVE**
* **LEXICON HJELPE**
* **LEXICON HOGGE**
* **LEXICON HOLDE**
* **LEXICON HUGGE**
* **LEXICON KLINGE**
* **LEXICON KLIPE**
* **LEXICON KLIVE**
* **LEXICON XYPE** = klype:kl
* **LEXICON KLYVE**
* **LEXICON XEKKE** = knekke, kvekke
* **LEXICON KNESTE**
* **LEXICON KNETTE**
* **LEXICON KNIPE**
* **LEXICON KOMME**
* **LEXICON KUNNE**
* **LEXICON LA**
* **LEXICON LE**
* **LEXICON LEGGE**
* **LEXICON LIGGE**
* **LEXICON LYDE**
* **LEXICON MÅTTE**
* **LEXICON MØTE**
* **LEXICON PIPE**
* **LEXICON RIVE**
* **LEXICON RYKE**
* **LEXICON SETTE**
* **LEXICON SELGE**
* **LEXICON SE**
* **LEXICON SIGE**
* **LEXICON SITTE**
* **LEXICON SI**
* **LEXICON SKJELVE**
* **LEXICON SKJÆRE**
* **LEXICON SKLI**
* **LEXICON SKRIDE**
* **LEXICON RIDE**
* **LEXICON LIDE**
* **LEXICON KVEDE**
* **LEXICON SKRIKE**
* **LEXICON SKRIVE**
* **LEXICON SKRYTE**
* **LEXICON SKULLE**
* **LEXICON SKVETTE**
* **LEXICON SKYTE**
* **LEXICON SKYVE**
* **LEXICON SLEPPE**
* **LEXICON SLÅSS**
* **LEXICON SLÅ**
* **LEXICON SMELLE**
* **LEXICON SMETTE**
* **LEXICON SMYGE**
* **LEXICON SMØRE**
* **LEXICON SNIKE**
* **LEXICON SNYTE**
* **LEXICON SOVE**
* **LEXICON SPINNE**
* **LEXICON SPREKKE**
* **LEXICON SPRETTE**
* **LEXICON SPRINGE**
* **LEXICON SPØRRE**
* **LEXICON STELE**
* **LEXICON STIGE**
* **LEXICON STIKKE**
* **LEXICON STJELE**
* **LEXICON STREKKE**
* **LEXICON STRIDE**
* **LEXICON STRYKE**
* **LEXICON STÅ**
* **LEXICON STØKKE**
* **LEXICON SVELTE**
* **LEXICON SVERGE**
* **LEXICON SVI**
* **LEXICON SVIKE**
* **LEXICON SVINGE**
* **LEXICON SVINNE**
* **LEXICON SVIVE**
* **LEXICON SYNGE**
* **LEXICON SYNKE**
* **LEXICON SØKKE**
* **LEXICON TA**
* **LEXICON TELLE**
* **LEXICON TIE**
* **LEXICON TRE_V**
* **LEXICON TORE**
* **LEXICON TREFFE**
* **LEXICON TREKKE**
* **LEXICON TRIVE**
* **LEXICON TRYTE**
* **LEXICON TRÅ**
* **LEXICON TVINGE**
* **LEXICON TYTE**
* **LEXICON TØRRE**
* **LEXICON VEIE**
* **LEXICON VELGE**
* **LEXICON VEVE**
* **LEXICON VIKE**
* **LEXICON VILLE**
* **LEXICON VINDE**
* **LEXICON VINNE**
* **LEXICON VITE**
* **LEXICON VRI**
* **LEXICON VÆRE**
* **LEXICON UNNVÆRE**
* **LEXICON XREKKE** = brekke, overrekke, radbrekk, rekke

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
